Hawaii statutes.
[§210D-14] Annual report. The
department shall submit a report of the actions taken under this chapter which
shall be included in the annual report pursuant to section 201-10. [L 1990, c
111, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next